Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-694.01
Operator's license; revocation; reinstatement fee.

Whenever an operator's license is ordered revoked by the court or by administrative action of the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to the Nebraska Rules of the Road, the licensee shall pay a reinstatement fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles to reinstate his or her eligibility for a new license, in addition to complying with the other applicable provisions of the Nebraska Rules of the Road. The reinstatement fee shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars. The department shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit seventy-five dollars of each fee to the General Fund and fifty dollars of each fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 46.